Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5508.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 706. (1) Except as allowed under this section, a settlement agreement relating to a claim described in subsection (2) must not contain a provision that prevents or restricts the disclosure of factual information related to the claim. (2) This section applies to a claim of assault, discrimination, harassment, or retaliation because of sex against an employer made in a complaint to the department as described in section 602 or in a civil action under article 8. (3) In a civil action described in subsection (2), the court shall not enter, by stipulation or otherwise, an order that restricts the disclosure of information in a manner that conflicts with subsection (1). (4) A provision that shields the identity of the claimant and all facts that could lead to the discovery of the claimant's identity, including pleadings filed in court, may be included in a settlement agreement at the request of the claimant. This subsection does not apply if a government agency or public official is a party to the settlement agreement. (5) A provision that precludes the disclosure of the amount paid in settlement of the claim may be included in a settlement agreement. (6) A provision in a settlement agreement that is prohibited by subsection (1) is void as a matter of law and against public policy.